Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 1
UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO

23-20-101. University of Colorado - role and mission - all campuses.

The role and mission of the several campuses of the university of Colorado are as follows:

The Boulder campus of the university of Colorado shall be a comprehensive graduate research university with selective admission standards. The Boulder campus of the university of Colorado shall offer a comprehensive array of undergraduate, master's, and doctoral degree programs. The Boulder campus of the university of Colorado has exclusive authority to offer graduate programs in law. The Colorado commission on higher education, in consultation with the board of regents, shall designate those graduate level programs that are the primary responsibility of the Boulder campus of the university of Colorado. The university has the responsibility to provide on a statewide basis, utilizing when possible and appropriate the faculty and facilities of other educational institutions, those graduate level programs. The commission shall include in its funding recommendations a level of general fund support for these programs.

The Denver campus of the university of Colorado shall be an urban comprehensive undergraduate and graduate research university with selective admission standards. The Denver campus shall offer baccalaureate, master's, and a limited number of doctoral degree programs, emphasizing those that serve the needs of the Denver metropolitan area. The Denver campus has statewide authority to offer graduate programs in public administration and exclusive authority in architecture and planning.

The Colorado Springs campus of the university of Colorado shall be a comprehensive baccalaureate and specialized graduate research university with selective admission standards. The Colorado Springs campus shall offer liberal arts and sciences, business, engineering, health sciences, and teacher preparation undergraduate degree programs, and a selected number of master's and doctoral degree programs.

The health sciences center campus of the university of Colorado shall offer specialized baccalaureate, first-professional, master's, and doctoral degree programs in health-related disciplines and professions. It is affiliated with the university of Colorado hospital and other health-care facilities that offer settings for education, clinical practice, and basic and applied research. Except for degree programs in osteopathic medicine described in section 23-40-101 (4), it has exclusive authority in medicine, dentistry, pharmacy, and physical therapy.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2748.

G.S.

§ 3438.

R.S. 08:

§ 6933.

C.L.

§ 7996.

CSA:

C. 169, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-1.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 762, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1013, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2593, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(1)(c) amended, (SB 11-204), ch. 308, p. 1509, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2022:

IP(1) and (1)(d) amended, (SB 22-056), ch. 27, p. 163, § 2, effective August 10.

23-20-102. Regents - election and term.

The university shall be governed by a board of nine regents, who shall be elected for terms of six years each as provided in this section.

At the general election held in 1974, and each six years thereafter through the general election held in 2016, three regents shall be elected, one of whom shall be a qualified elector of, and elected by the qualified electors of, the first congressional district; one of whom shall be a qualified elector of, and elected by the qualified electors of, the fourth congressional district; and one of whom shall be a qualified elector of this state and elected at large by the qualified electors of this state.
(2) (a) (I) At the general election held in 1974, and each six years thereafter through the general election held in 2016, three regents shall be elected, one of whom shall be a qualified elector of, and elected by the qualified electors of, the first congressional district; one of whom shall be a qualified elector of, and elected by the qualified electors of, the fourth congressional district; and one of whom shall be a qualified elector of this state and elected at large by the qualified electors of this state.

At the general election held in 2022, and each six years thereafter, three regents shall be elected, one of whom shall be a qualified elector of, and elected by the qualified electors of, the first congressional district; one of whom shall be a qualified elector of, and elected by the qualified electors of, the fourth congressional district; and one of whom shall be a qualified elector of, and elected by the qualified electors of, the eighth congressional district.

At the general election held in 1976, and each six years thereafter, three regents shall be elected, one of whom shall be a qualified elector of, and elected by the qualified electors of, the third congressional district; one of whom shall be a qualified elector of, and elected by the qualified electors of, the fifth congressional district; and one of whom shall be a qualified elector of this state and elected at large by the qualified electors of this state.

At the general election held in 1978, and each six years thereafter through the general election held in 1996, three regents shall be elected, one of whom shall be a resident of, and elected by the qualified electors of, the second congressional district, one of whom shall be a resident of, and elected by the qualified electors of, the sixth congressional district, and one of whom shall be a qualified elector of this state and elected at large by the qualified electors of this state.

At the general election held in 2002, and each six years thereafter, three regents shall be elected, one of whom shall be a resident of, and elected by the qualified electors of, the second congressional district, one of whom shall be a resident of, and elected by the qualified electors of, the sixth congressional district, and one of whom shall be a resident of, and elected by the qualified electors of, the seventh congressional district.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2750.

G.S.

§ 3441.

R.S. 08:

§ 6937.

C.L.

§ 8000.

CSA:

C. 169, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-5.

L. 73:

p. 1323, § 1.

L. 81:

(2)(c) amended, p. 1114, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 2001:

(2)(c) amended, p. 1083, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 32, § 40, effective February 25.

23-20-103. Oath or affirmation of regents.

The members of the board of regents shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2751.

G.S.

§ 3442.

R.S. 08:

§ 6938.

C.L.

§ 8001.

CSA:

C. 169, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-6.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 694, § 9, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

23-20-104. Meetings - quorum.

The meetings of the board of regents shall be held at such times and places as the board may appoint; but not less than two meetings per annum shall be held at the university. The president of the board may call special meetings where he deems it expedient, or special meetings may be called by any three members of the board. A majority of the regents shall constitute a quorum and be competent for the transaction of business.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2755.

G.S.

§ 3446.

R.S. 08:

§ 6942.

C.L.

§ 8004.

CSA:

C. 169, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-9.

23-20-105. Governor to fill vacancies.

The governor of the state shall fill all vacancies that may occur in the board of regents. The persons so appointed shall hold their offices until the next general election and until their successors are elected and duly qualified according to law.

The governor shall appoint, effective July 1, 1973, three persons to fill vacancies on the board of regents which will exist as of said date by virtue of section 12 of article IX of the state constitution, one such appointment to be of a qualified elector of the state for a term expiring on the second Tuesday in January, 1975, one qualified elector of the state for a term expiring on the second Tuesday in January, 1977, and one qualified elector of the state for a term expiring on the second Tuesday in January, 1979. Their respective successors in office shall be elected from the state at large, as provided in section 23-20-102.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2753.

G.S.

§ 3444.

R.S. 08:

§ 6940.

C.L.

§ 8002.

CSA:

C. 169, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-7.

L. 73:

p. 1324, § 2.

23-20-106. President - election.

The regents of the university shall elect a president of the university, who shall be an employee-at-will pursuant to section 24-19-104, C.R.S., and whose employment shall be subject to the restrictions imposed by article 19 of title 24, C.R.S. The president shall be the principal executive officer of the university and a member of the faculty thereof and shall carry out the policies and programs established by the board of regents.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2754.

G.S.

§ 3445.

R.S. 08:

§ 6941.

C.L.

§ 8003.

CSA:

C. 169, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-8.

L. 73:

p. 1324, § 3.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 851, § 6, effective May 23.

23-20-107. President to report - contents.

The president of the university shall make a report on the first day of September of each year to the board of regents. The report shall exhibit the condition and progress of the institution in its several departments, the different courses of study pursued therein, the branches taught, the means and methods of instruction adopted, the number of students with their names, classes, and residences, and such other matters as he may deem proper to communicate.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2767.

G.S.

§ 3458.

R.S. 08:

§ 6954.

C.L.

§ 8026.

CSA:

C. 169, § 29.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-28.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-18.

23-20-108. Secretary - duties.

The board of regents shall elect a secretary, who shall hold the office during the pleasure of the board. The secretary shall record all the proceedings of the board of regents in a visual text format that may be transmitted electronically and carefully preserve all its books and papers. The secretary's books shall show how the permanent fund of the university has been invested; the amount of each kind of securities, if any, with the date thereof, and when due; the interest thereon, and when and where payable; the amount of each loan, if any, when made and payable to whom, how secured, at what rate of interest, and when and where payable. The secretary shall countersign and register all warrants and checks. The treasurer shall not pay a warrant or a check for money unless the same is drawn by the president and countersigned by the secretary.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2760.

G.S.

§ 3451.

R.S. 08:

§ 6947.

C.L.

§ 8009.

CSA:

C. 169, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-14.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1118), ch. 130, p. 560, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1391), ch. 328, p. 1448, § 1, effective June 5.

23-20-109. Treasurer - duties - bond.

The board of regents shall elect a treasurer of the university, who shall hold his or her office at the pleasure of the board. The treasurer shall keep a true and faithful account of all money received and paid out by him or her and shall pay all warrants and checks as presented. The treasurer shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101. He or she shall also give a bond in the penal sum of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars, conditioned for the faithful discharge of his or her duties as treasurer, that he or she will at all times keep and render a true account of all money and other valuables received by him or her as treasurer and of the disposition he or she has made of the same, and that he or she will at all times be ready to discharge himself or herself of the trust and to deliver up when required by said board all money, notes, bonds, and other valuables entrusted to him or her. The bond shall have two or more sureties and be approved as to its form and the sufficiency of its sureties by the board of regents, the attorney general, and the secretary of state, who shall endorse their approval on the same. The bond shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2761.

G.S.

§ 3452.

R.S. 08:

§ 6948.

C.L.

§ 8010.

CSA:

C. 169, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-15.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1391), ch. 328, p. 1448, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 694, § 10, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

23-20-110. Attorney general legal advisor.

The attorney general of the state is the legal advisor of the president and board of regents of the university, and he or she shall institute and prosecute or defend all suits in behalf of the same.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2773.

G.S.

§ 3464.

R.S. 08:

§ 6961.

C.L.

§ 8032.

CSA:

C. 169, § 35.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-32.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-22.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1094), ch. 94, p. 270, § 24, effective August 10.

23-20-111. Supervisory powers of board.

The board of regents has general supervision of the university and control and direction of all funds of and appropriations to the university.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2756.

G.S.

§ 3447.

R.S. 08:

§ 6943.

C.L.

§ 8005.

CSA:

C. 169, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-10.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 570, § 1, effective March 17.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1848, § 23, effective June 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 391, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

23-20-112. General powers of the board - definitions.

The board of regents shall enact laws for the government of the university; appoint the requisite number of professors, tutors, and all other officers; and determine the salaries of such officers and the amount to be paid for tuition in accordance with the level of cash fund appropriations set by the general assembly for the university pursuant to section 23-1-104 (1)(b)(I). It shall remove any officer connected with the university when in its judgment the good of the institution requires it.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an institution governed by the board of regents may use funding provided pursuant to section 23-18-303.5 as financial assistance for in-state students to reduce the student's share of in-state tuition, as defined in section 23-18-102.

For purposes of parts 1 and 2 of article 18 of this title, for an institution governed by the board of regents, "student's share of in-state tuition" has the same meaning as set forth in section 23-18-102 less the amount of any financial assistance awarded to the student pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3).

Source:

G.L.

§ 2757.

G.S.

§ 3448.

R.S. 08:

§ 6944.

C.L.

§ 8006.

CSA:

C. 169, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-11.

L. 70:

p. 357, § 10.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1519, § 25, effective June 6.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 118, § 3, effective March 19.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1842, § 8, effective June 9.

L. 2014:

(3) added, (HB 14-1319), ch. 169, p. 612, § 6, effective May 9.

L. 2020:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 20-1366), ch. 181, p. 835, § 14, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (2), effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2010, p. 1842.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 391, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

23-20-113. Board to fix salaries.

The board of regents shall determine the compensation of the secretary and the treasurer of the university, and the regents are ineligible to the office of treasurer.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2762.

G.S.

§ 3453.

R.S. 08:

§ 6949.

C.L.

§ 8011.

CSA:

C. 169, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-16.

23-20-114. Employment of medical personnel.

The board of regents of the university of Colorado has authority to employ medical personnel who are not citizens of the United States at the university of Colorado health sciences center, the university of Colorado psychiatric hospital, and the medical division of the graduate school of the university of Colorado. Medical personnel who are not citizens of the United States are exempt from the licensure requirements of the "Colorado Medical Practice Act", article 240 of title 12, with respect to services performed in the course of such employment, but such personnel shall first comply with all other requirements of said act, which includes the taking and passing of examinations approved by the Colorado medical board and by the National Board of Medical Examiners, the National Board of Examiners for Osteopathic Physicians and Surgeons, or the Federation of State Medical Boards, or their successor organizations, on subjects relating to the basic sciences as provided by law within three months after the date of employment unless such examinations are not required by section 12-240-110 (1)(b). Such exemptions from licensure or provisions in this section provided for such personnel who are not citizens of the United States shall continue only during the minimum period of time within which the particular individual can become a citizen according to the laws of the United States and the regulations of the immigration and naturalization service of the United States, department of justice, or any successor agency, or such additional time as may be granted by such boards. The exemptions in this section are limited to services performed in the course of employment with the university of Colorado as limited in this section and shall terminate when such employment terminates.

The board of regents may arrange for the billing, collection, and disbursement for professional services rendered by physicians and other faculty members of the health sciences schools through a nonprofit corporation or through a contractual arrangement with a profit or nonprofit corporation or through such other mechanism as may be authorized by the board of regents. Any mechanism employed under the authority of this subsection (2) shall be self-supporting. Any such mechanism shall allow for contracting with the board of regents or the state of Colorado for reimbursement of physician services provided for the medically indigent.

The fees collected under this subsection (2) shall be used for the remuneration and support of the professional, research, and educational activities of the members of the faculty of the health sciences schools and shall also be used for the administrative costs of such activities, in accordance with rules to be adopted by the board of regents.

The board of regents, at the request of the general assembly, the joint budget committee, or the state auditor, shall provide a report of the financial status of any funds maintained pursuant to this subsection (2), including but not limited to expenditures, revenues, and the number of staff and faculty involved.

Nothing in this subsection (2) shall be construed to give the board of regents any control over or power to arrange for the billing, collection, and disbursement of hospital fees of the university of Colorado hospital authority operating the university of Colorado university hospital pursuant to the provisions of part 5 of article 21 of this title, any control over how such hospital fees are spent in the operation of the hospital, or any control over the hospital's gross income, the budget and spending of the hospital, or the hospital's authority to borrow money or incur debt.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 874, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-33.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 415, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 280, § 27, effective August 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 524, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1003, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 585, § 4, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1260), ch. 403, p. 1988, § 80, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1163, § 52, effective August 10.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1683, § 119, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section was amended in House Bill No. 1143, enacted by the General Assembly at its first regular session in 1989, as a conforming amendment necessitated by the authorization for the operation of the university of Colorado university hospital by a nonprofit-nonstock corporation. The Colorado Supreme Court subsequently declared House Bill No. 1143 unconstitutional in its entirety. See

Colorado Association of Public Employees v. Board of Regents,

804 P.2d 138 (Colo. 1990). Senate Bill 91-225, enacted by the General Assembly at its first regular session in 1991, authorized the operation of university hospital by a newly created university of Colorado hospital authority. Since the previous act was declared unconstitutional in its entirety, the General Assembly elected to make a similar conforming amendment to this section in Senate Bill 91-225. For further explanation of the circumstances surrounding the enactment of Senate Bill 91-225, see the legislative declaration contained in section 1 of chapter 99, Session Laws of Colorado 1991.

23-20-115. Departments - degrees - diplomas.

The university shall include a classical, philosophical, normal, scientific, law, physical sciences, and preparatory department and such other departments, with courses of instruction and elective studies, as the board of regents may determine. The board has authority to confer such degrees and grant such diplomas and other marks of distinction as are usually conferred and granted by other universities. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the regents to establish the several departments until such time as in their judgment the wants and necessities of the people require it. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the Colorado commission on higher education to direct the board of regents to discontinue an academic or vocational degree program area pursuant to section 23-1-107 (2).

Source:

G.L.

§ 2758.

G.S.

§ 3449.

L. 07:

p. 590, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6945.

C.L.

§ 8007.

CSA:

C. 169, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-12.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 762, § 4, effective July 1.

23-20-116. Claims against university.

Except with respect to claims coming within the provisions of article 10 of title 24, C.R.S., the board of regents shall audit all claims against the university, and the president shall draw all warrants and checks for approved claims; but before payment such warrants and checks shall be countersigned by the secretary, who shall keep a specific and complete record of all matters involving the expenditure of money, which record shall be submitted to the board of regents at each regular meeting of the same.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2763.

G.S.

§ 3454.

R.S. 08:

§ 6950.

C.L.

§ 8012.

CSA:

C. 169, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-17.

L. 71:

p. 1216, § 14.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1391), ch. 328, p. 1449, § 3, effective June 5.

23-20-117. Power and authority of regents to invest. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 805, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-40.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-30.

L. 74:

Entire section repealed, p. 381, § 1, effective May 8.

23-20-117.5. University of Colorado fund - creation - control - use.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the university of Colorado fund that shall be under the control and administration of the board of regents of the university of Colorado in accordance with the provisions of this part 1. The board of regents shall have authority and responsibility for all university funds. The board of regents shall designate, pursuant to its statutory authority, those moneys whether received by appropriation, grant, contract, gift, or any other means that shall be credited to said fund together with all interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund. The moneys in the fund shall remain under the control of the regents of the university of Colorado and shall not be transferred or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year.

The moneys in the university of Colorado fund shall be used by the board of regents of the university of Colorado for the payment of salaries and operating expenses of the board and the institutions it governs, as well as for the payment of any other expenses incurred by the board in carrying out its statutory powers and duties.

Moneys in the university of Colorado fund may be invested by the state treasurer in investments authorized by sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113, C.R.S., any public-private initiatives with the department of transportation, as defined in section 43-1-1201 (3), C.R.S., and bonds issued for turnpikes in accordance with part 2 of article 3 of title 43, C.R.S. The board shall determine the amount of moneys to be credited in the fund. Until the board of regents withdraws the moneys from the fund, the state treasurer shall invest the moneys on behalf of the board of regents.

The board of regents shall establish an investment advisory committee consisting of at least five members to make recommendations to it regarding investments. The investment committee shall include the university of Colorado treasurer, the state treasurer, a member of the board of regents, and two representatives of the financial community.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 537, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(3) amended, p. 445, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 613, § 12, effective May 18.

L. 2005:

(3) amended, p. 278, § 8, effective August 8.

23-20-118. Investments in consolidated funds.

Unless otherwise restrained by the terms of a will, trust agreement, or other instrument of gift, the regents of the university of Colorado are authorized to hold investments in one or more consolidated investment funds in which the participating trusts or accounts have undivided interests.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 806, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-41.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-31.

23-20-119. Corporate stock in name of nominee authorized - report.

In order to facilitate the investment, reinvestment, sale, and disposition of corporate stocks, the regents of the university of Colorado are authorized to hold certificates of stock in the name of a nominee of their selection without disclosing the fact that certificates are held by the regents or are held in a fiduciary capacity, if:

The records of the regents and all reports or accounts rendered by them clearly show the ownership of the stock by the regents and the facts regarding their holding; and

The nominee deposits with the regents a signed statement showing the trust ownership, endorses the stock certificate in blank, and does not have possession of the stock certificate or access thereto except under the immediate supervision of the treasurer of the university or such other person as the regents designate.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), a report shall be made by the regents of the university of Colorado, to the general assembly at each regular session, of the investments made and the interest derived therefrom under the provisions of this section and section 23-20-118.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 806, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-42.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-32.

L. 76:

(2) amended, p. 304, § 38, effective May 20.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (HB 17-1251), ch. 253, p. 1060, § 10, effective August 9.

23-20-120. Donations - invested.

All donations of money, securities, or other property shall be conveyed to the regents of the university and invested as other funds of the university. Donations may be made to, and for the sole use of, any of the departments of the university, and donations so made shall be kept in a separate fund for the use of such department.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2772.

G.S.

§ 3463.

R.S. 08:

§ 6960.

C.L.

§ 8031.

CSA:

C. 169, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-31.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-21.

23-20-121. Money from university lands.

All moneys which arise from the sale of public lands belonging to the university of Colorado, or from the leasing of lands belonging to the said university, or from interest arising on the investment of such funds are placed under the exclusive control of the regents of the said university. The treasurer of the state of Colorado is instructed to turn over to the said regents all the moneys, warrants, bonds, and other securities of any nature that have come from the sale of said public lands belonging to said university.

Source:

L. 1895:

p. 237, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6958.

C.L.

§ 8029.

CSA:

C. 169, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-29.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-19.

23-20-122. Raising funds for university student memorial center.

For the purpose of raising funds from time to time for erecting, purchasing, otherwise acquiring, reconstructing, improving, adding to, extending, bettering, equipping, and furnishing, or any combination thereof, a student memorial center consisting of one or more buildings on the campus of the university of Colorado, the board of regents thereof, designated as the "regents of the university of Colorado" (in this section sometimes designated as the "board"), is authorized to enter into contracts with persons or corporations advancing money for such purposes, under which contracts the board is authorized to pledge the net income from the student memorial center, its facilities, and special student fees assessed for the purpose of financing the student memorial center or any part of such net income to the repayment of any sums so advanced and interest thereon.

The board shall not pledge the general income of the university or create any mortgage upon property belonging to such institution or obligate the state of Colorado for the purpose of repaying or receiving any funds raised or advanced under the provisions of this section.

For the purpose of evidencing any such loan, the board may issue, in its name and on its behalf, notes, debentures, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness, in this section sometimes designated as "obligations".

Any obligations may be refunded by the board, subject to provisions concerning their payment and any other contractual limitations in any proceedings authorizing the issuance of the obligations or otherwise appertaining thereto, by the issuance of obligations to refund, pay, and discharge all or any part of outstanding obligations for the purpose of avoiding or terminating any default, reducing interest costs or effecting other economies, or modifying or eliminating restrictive contractual limitations concerning the outstanding obligations of the student memorial center, or any combination thereof.

Any obligations issued for refunding purposes either may be delivered in exchange for the outstanding obligations being refunded or may be publicly or privately sold.

No obligations may be refunded under this section unless the holders thereof voluntarily surrender them for exchange or payment or unless they either mature or are callable for prior redemption under their terms within ten years from the date of issuance of the refunding obligations. Provision shall be made for paying the obligations within said period of time. The principal amount of the refunding obligations may exceed the principal amount of the refunded obligations if the aggregate principal and interest costs of the refunding obligations do not exceed such unaccrued costs of the obligations refunded. The principal amount of the refunding obligations may also be less than or the same as the principal amount of the obligations being refunded so long as provision is duly and sufficiently made for the payment of the refunded obligations.

The proceeds of refunding obligations shall either be immediately applied to the retirement of the obligations to be refunded or placed in escrow in any state or national bank within the state which is a member of the federal deposit insurance corporation to be applied to the payment of the obligations being refunded upon their presentation therefor. To the extent any incidental expenses have been capitalized, such refunding obligation proceeds may be used to defray such expenses. Any accrued interest and any premium appertaining to a sale of refunding obligations may be applied to the payment of the interest thereon, the principal thereof, or both interest and principal or deposited in a reserve therefor as the board may determine. Any such escrow shall not necessarily be limited to proceeds of refunding obligations but may include other moneys available for its purpose. Any proceeds in escrow, pending such use, may be invested or reinvested in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Such proceeds and investments in escrow, together with any interest to be derived from any such investment, shall be in an amount at all times sufficient as to principal, interest, any prior redemption premium due, and any charges of the escrow agent payable therefrom to pay the obligations being refunded as they become due at their respective maturities or due at any designated prior redemption date in connection with which the board exercises a prior redemption option. Any purchaser of any obligation issued under this section shall in no manner be responsible for the application of the proceeds thereof by the board or any of its officers, agents, or employees.

Refunding obligations may be made payable from any net revenues derived from the student memorial center, or any portion thereof, notwithstanding that the pledge of such revenues for the payment of the outstanding obligations being refunded is thereby modified.

Obligations for refunding and obligations for any other purpose authorized may be issued separately or in combination in one series or more.

The board shall establish a maximum net effective interest rate for obligations issued under this section. Such obligations shall bear interest at a rate or rates such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of obligations does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate established. Such interest shall be payable semiannually or annually and evidenced by one or two sets of coupons, if any, executed with the facsimile or manually executed signature of any official or officials of the board; except that the first coupon or coupons appertaining to any obligation may evidence interest not in excess of one year, and such obligations may be in one series or more, may bear such date or dates, may mature at such time or times not exceeding forty years from their respective dates, may be designated or redesignated, may be in such denomination or denominations, may be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places within or without the state, may carry such registration privileges, may be subject to such terms of prior redemption in advance of maturity in such order or by lot or otherwise at such time or times with or without a premium, may be executed in such manner, may bear such privileges for reissuance in the same or other denominations, may be so reissued without modification of maturities and interest rates, and may be in such form, either coupon or registered, as may be provided by resolution of the board.

The obligations shall never be sold at a price such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of obligations exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate established.

Obligations may be issued with privileges for conversion or registration, or both, for payment as to principal or interest, or both. If interest accruing on the obligations is not represented by interest coupons, the obligations may provide for the endorsing of payments of interest thereon. The obligations generally shall be issued in such manner, in such form, either coupon or registered, with such recitals, terms, and provisions for subordination of subsequently issued obligations and such covenants and conditions, and with such other details as may be provided by the board, except as otherwise provided in this section.

All obligations and the income therefrom shall be exempt from taxation, except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

All moneys received from the issuance of any obligations authorized in this section shall be used solely for the purpose for which issued and the cost of any project designated by the board and authorized in this section, including interest or discount on obligations, or both; cost of issuance of obligations; architectural, engineering, and inspection costs and legal expenses; costs of financial, professional, and other estimates and advice; contingencies; any administrative, operating, and other expenses of the board appertaining to a student memorial center prior to and during such acquisition or improvement and equipment, and additionally during a period of not exceeding one year after the completion thereof, as may be estimated and determined by the board in any resolution authorizing the issuance of any obligations or other instrument appertaining thereto, and all such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing, acquisition, improvement, equipment, and completion of said center or part thereof, the placing of the same in operation, and also any provision or reserves for working capital, operation, maintenance, or replacement expenses, or for payment or security of principal of or interest on any obligations during or after such acquisition or improvement and equipment as the board may determine, and also reimbursements to the board, any bank, other corporation, or any other person of any moneys previously expended for the purposes of said center; except that any accrued interest and any premium appertaining to a sale of obligations may be applied to the payment of the interest thereon and the principal thereof, or both interest and principal, or may be deposited in a reserve therefor, as the board may determine.

The powers conferred by this section shall be in addition and supplemental to and not in substitution for, and the limitations imposed by this section shall not affect, the powers conferred by any other law. Obligations may be issued under this section without regard to the provisions of any other law. Insofar as the provisions of this section are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this section shall be controlling.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 732, §§ 1, 2.

CSA:

C. 169, § 36(1).

CRS 53:

§ 124-2-34.

L. 63:

pp. 869, 873, §§ 1, 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-2-24.

L. 70:

p. 346, § 3.

L. 89:

(7) amended, p. 1110, § 15, effective July 1.